Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.060

Prohibited practices.

No person may directly or indirectly, in or in connection with the purchase or sale of, the offer to sell, the offer to enter into, or the entry into of, any commodity contract or commodity option subject to RCW 21.30.020, 21.30.030, 21.30.040(1)(b), or 21.30.040(1)(d):

(1) Cheat or defraud, or attempt to cheat or defraud, any other person or employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud any other person;

(2) Make any false report, enter any false record, or make any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;

(3) Engage in any transaction, act, practice, or course of business, including, without limitation, any form of advertising or solicitation, that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person; or

(4) Misappropriate or convert the funds, security, or property of any other person.

[ 1986 c 14 s 6.]